North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 36. Entitlement of Indigent Persons Generally.
§ 7A-455.1.
Appointment fee in criminal cases.

In every criminal case in which counsel is appointed at the trial level, the judge shall order the defendant to pay to the clerk of court an appointment fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00). No fee shall be due unless the person is convicted.

The mandatory seventy-five dollar ($75.00) fee may not be remitted or revoked by the court and shall be added to any amounts the court determines to be owed for the value of legal services rendered to the defendant and shall be collected in the same manner as attorneys’ fees are collected for such representation.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-250 s. 3, effective August 4, 2005.

Inability, failure, or refusal to pay the appointment fee shall not be grounds for denying appointment of counsel, for withdrawal of counsel, or for contempt.

The appointment fee required by this section shall be assessed only once for each attorney appointment, regardless of the number of cases to which the attorney was assigned. An additional appointment fee shall not be assessed if the charges for which an attorney was appointed were reassigned to a different attorney.

Of each appointment fee collected under this section, the sum of seventy dollars ($70.00) shall be credited to the Indigent Persons’ Attorney Fee Fund and the sum of five dollars ($5.00) shall be credited to the Court Information Technology Fund under

G.S. 7A-343.2

. These fees shall not revert.

The Office of Indigent Defense Services shall adopt rules and develop forms to govern implementation of this section.

History.

2002-126, s. 29A.9(a); 2003-284, s. 13.11; 2005-250, s. 3; 2009-451, s. 15.17I(a); 2010-31, s. 15.11(a); 2012-142, s. 16.5(h); 2020-83, s. 10.1(a).

§ 7A-456.
False statements; penalty.

A false material statement made by a person under oath or affirmation in regard to the question of his indigency constitutes a Class I felony.

A judicial official making the determination of indigency shall notify the person of the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 11.1.

History.

1969, c. 1013, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 113(c); c. 1100, s. 11.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 767, s. 19.

§ 7A-457.
Waiver of counsel; pleas of guilty.

An indigent person who has been informed of his right to be represented by counsel at any in-court proceeding, may, in writing, waive the right to in-court representation by counsel in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services. Any waiver of counsel shall be effective only if the court finds of record that at the time of waiver the indigent person acted with full awareness of his rights and of the consequences of the waiver. In making such a finding, the court shall consider, among other things, such matters as the person’s age, education, familiarity with the English language, mental condition, and the complexity of the crime charged.

If an indigent person waives counsel as provided in subsection (a), and pleads guilty to any offense, the court shall inform him of the nature of the offense and the possible consequences of his plea, and as a condition of accepting the plea of guilty the court shall examine the person and shall ascertain that the plea was freely, understandably and voluntarily made, without undue influence, compulsion or duress, and without promise of leniency.

An indigent person who has been informed of his right to be represented by counsel at any out-of-court proceeding, may, either orally or in writing, waive the right to out-of-court representation by counsel.

History.

1969, c. 1013, s. 1; 1971, c. 1243; 1973, c. 151, s. 3; 2000-144, s. 11.

Cross References.

As to scope of entitlement to counsel, see

G.S. 7A-451

.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on waiver of Miranda rights, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 219 (1980).

§ 7A-458.
Counsel fees.

The fee to which an attorney who represents an indigent person is entitled shall be fixed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services. Fees shall be based on the factors normally considered in fixing attorneys’ fees, such as the nature of the case, and the time, effort and responsibility involved. Fees shall not be set or ordered at rates higher than those established by the rules adopted under this section without the approval of the Office of Indigent Defense Services. Even if the trial, appeal, hearing or other proceeding is never held, preparation therefor is nevertheless compensable and, in capital cases and other extraordinary cases pending in superior court, a fee for services rendered and payment for expenses incurred may be allowed pending final determination of the case.

History.

1969, c. 1013, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 113(b); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 116(b); 2000-144, s. 12; 2005-276, s. 14.13.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

§ 7A-459.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2000-144, s. 13, as amended by Session Laws 2001-424, s. 22.11(c), effective July 1, 2001.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

§§ 7A-460 through 7A-464.

Reserved for future codification purposes.